src/fst/test/older-gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-sihkihp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sihkihp - ok : # -m animate noun, blackbird
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg: sihkihp
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl: sihkihpak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Loc: sihkihpinâhk
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [sihkihpis, sihkihpisis]
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [sihkihpisak, sihkihpisisak]

     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihpim
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihpim
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpima
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpiminân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpiminaw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpima
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpiminânak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpiminawak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimiwâwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimis
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nisihkihpimisinân
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kisihkihpimisinaw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimisiwâw
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa

     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nisihkihpimisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kisihkihpimisak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nisihkihpimisinânak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kisihkihpimisinawak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kisihkihpimisiwâwak
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiwâwa
     sihkihp+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: osihkihpimisiyiwa
